Maryland, session 2025, SB0551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
27–501.
(k) With respect to private passenger motor vehicle insurance, an insurer may
not:
(1) cancel or refuse to renew coverage based on the claims history of an
insured where two or fewer of the claims within the preceding 3–year period were for
accidents or losses where the insured was not at fault for the loss; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0551*

SENATE BILL 551
(2) INCREASE A PREMIUM, ADD A SURCHARGE, OR REMOVE, ALTER,
OR REFUSE TO CONSIDER A DISCOUNT BASED ON ACCIDENTS OR LOSSES:
(I) CAUSED BY A COLLISION WITH A FREE–ROAMING WILD
ANIMAL; AND
(II) FOR WHICH THE INSURED WAS NOT AT FAULT FOR THE
LOSS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.